Mississippi statutes. Title 59. Ports, Harbors, Landings and Watercraft
Article 11. Revenue Bonds.

§ 59-7-501.
Authorization for issuance of revenue bonds for port or harbor improvement.

The board of supervisors of any county which has elected or hereafter may elect to establish a port commission under the provisions of Article 3 of this chapter, and which desires to improve its port and harbor facilities by the construction, maintenance and operation of any revenue-producing port and/or harbor facility or facilities may issue revenue bonds of such county to provide funds for such purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-51; Laws, 1970, ch. 407, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1970).

§ 59-7-503.
Issuance of bonds without election; form, terms and execution of bonds.

Revenue bonds authorized by Section 59-7-501 may be issued without an election thereon upon the adoption of a resolution by the board of supervisors of such county upon the request and recommendation of the port commission of such county. Such revenue bonds shall not be subject to any limitation as to amount and shall not be included in computing the statutory limitation of indebtedness of such county under any present or future law. Such bonds shall bear date or dates, shall be of such denomination or denominations, shall be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, shall mature at such time or times and upon such terms and may be made redeemable prior to maturity with or without premium, shall bear such registration privileges and shall be in substantially such form as shall be determined by resolution of the board of supervisors of such county. Such bonds shall mature in annual installments beginning not more than five (5) years from the date thereof and extending not more than twenty-five (25) years from the date thereof. Such bonds shall be signed by the president of the board of supervisors of such county and the official seal of the county shall be affixed thereto, attested by the clerk of the board of supervisors of such county. The interest coupons to be attached to such bonds may be executed by the facsimile signatures of such officers. Whenever such bonds shall have been signed by the officials designated to sign the same who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers prior to the date of the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds and coupons shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until the delivery of the same to the purchaser or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-52; Laws, 1970, ch. 407, § 2; Laws, 1982, ch. 434, § 31, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1982).

§ 59-7-505.
Interest on bonds.

All bonds shall bear interest at such rate or rates as may be determined by resolution of the board of supervisors of the county issuing them, not to exceed an overall maximum interest rate to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-103, Mississippi Code of 1972. No bond shall bear more than one (1) rate of interest; each bond shall bear interest from its date to its stated maturity date at the interest rate specified in the bid; all bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest from date to maturity; all interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year.

No interest payment shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon and neither cancelled nor supplemental coupons shall be permitted; the lowest interest rate specified for any bonds issued shall not be less than sixty percent (60%) of the highest interest rate specified for the same bond issue. The interest rate of any one (1) interest coupon shall not exceed the maximum interest rate allowed on such bonds.

Each interest rate specified in any bid must be in multiples of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) or in multiples of one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%), and a zero rate of interest cannot be named.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-53; Laws, 1970, ch. 407, § 3; Laws, 1981, ch. 462, § 18; Laws, 1982, ch. 434, § 32; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 39, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1983).

§ 59-7-507.
Negotiability of bonds and coupons; exemption from taxation.

All bonds and interest coupons issued under the provisions of this article shall have and hereby are declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the Uniform Commercial Code of the State of Mississippi. Such bonds and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation within the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-54; Laws, 1970, ch. 407, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1970).

§ 59-7-509.
Sale of bonds.

The board of supervisors of any county issuing bonds under the provisions of this article shall sell such bonds on sealed bids at not less than par plus accrued interest to date of delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, and in the manner provided in Section 31-19-25, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-55; Laws, 1970, ch. 407, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1970).

§ 59-7-511.
Disposition of proceeds of bonds.

The proceeds of the revenue bonds shall be paid into a special fund designated as the “special project port improvement fund” in a bank or banks qualified as depositories for the county issuing bonds under the provisions of this article, and such proceeds shall be used solely for the purposes for which such bonds were issued, except as hereinafter provided, and shall be disbursed upon order of the board of supervisors of such county with such restrictions, if any, as the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds may provide. If the proceeds of such bonds, by error of calculation or otherwise, shall be less than the cost of the project for which such bonds were issued, and the redeeming of any outstanding bonds, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of such deficit which, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same funds without preference or priority of the bonds first issued for the same purpose. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue shall exceed the amount required for the project for which the bonds were issued, such surplus shall be paid into the fund established for the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-56; Laws, 1970, ch. 407, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1970).

§ 59-7-513.
Conditions for issuance of bonds; validation of bonds.

The revenue bonds authorized to be issued by the provisions of this article may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those specified or required by this article. In the discretion of the board of supervisors of such county the bonds authorized and issued hereunder may be submitted to validation in the chancery court of such county in the manner and with the force and effect now or hereafter provided by Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district and other bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-57; Laws, 1970, ch. 407, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1970).

§ 59-7-515.
Sources for payment of principal and interest on bonds.

The revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this article shall be payable, both principal and interest, solely out of the revenues to accrue from the operation of the facilities provided through the special project for which such bonds are issued, and the full faith and credit of the county shall not be pledged therefor, nor shall any ad valorem tax be levied for the payment of such bonds or the interest thereon, and such facts shall be recited on the face of the bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-58; Laws, 1970, ch. 407, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1970).

§ 59-7-517.
Operation and maintenance of facilities and establishment of user rates, fees and charges by county issuing bonds.

Any county issuing revenue bonds under the provisions of this article is hereby authorized by contract or otherwise to provide for the operation and maintenance of facilities provided through the special project for which such bonds are issued and to establish the rates, fees and charges to be paid by users of such port and/or harbor facilities and shall provide for a revision of such rates, fees and charges from time to time as may be necessary to assure the sufficiency of funds to meet the covenants and pledges made in the resolution pursuant to which such bonds were issued.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-59; Laws, 1970, ch. 407, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1970).

§ 59-7-519.
Disposition of revenues from facilities.

All revenues of every kind and character derived from the operation of the facilities of any special project authorized by the provisions of this article shall be paid into the port fund of such county and into a special account in said fund to be designated as the “special project revenue fund” and the resolution of the board of supervisors directing the issuance of such bonds shall require that such revenues shall be allocated to and shall be pledged for the following purposes:

an operation and maintenance fund out of which there shall be paid the usual and necessary expenses for the operation and maintenance of the project facilities;

a renewal and replacement fund sufficient to assure that the project facilities, including equipment, shall be kept in good repair and working order;

a bond and interest fund which shall be sufficient to provide for the payment of the principal of and the interest on the bonds as they mature and accrue, including a reasonable sum for the creation of a bond reserve fund to assure the payment of such bonds and the interest therein in the event that sufficient funds therefor are not otherwise available; and

a contingent fund to provide for unforeseen contingencies arising in the operation of the project facilities. Any surplus funds remaining after making the foregoing allocations shall be dealt with as may be directed by the resolution of the board of supervisors whereunder such bonds are issued, for the repayment of advances received from any source, for the payment of any maturities of principal and interest of such bonds, for the improvement of the port and/or harbor facilities for which such bonds were issued, or for the retirement of the outstanding bonds according to their terms.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7576-60; Laws, 1970, ch. 407, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1970).